other.lexd
LEXICON Adverb
абараса<adv>:абараса
агӏыла<adv>:агӏыла
анаса-араса<adv>:анаса-араса
анаса<adv>:анаса
анасагьи-арасагьи<adv>:анасагьи-арасагьи
ахъазыкӏ<adv>:ахъазыкӏ
байанта<adv>:байанта
бзи<adv>:бзи
бзита<adv>:бзита
гвырчӏвагата<adv>:гвырчӏвагата
датшата<adv>:датшата
закӏыта<adv>:закӏыта
адымцӏуата<adv>:адымцӏуата
къвытхӏара<adv>:къвытхӏара
рахӏа<adv>:рахӏа
йакврыдзцауа<adv>:йакврыдзцауа
нейзаман<adv>:нейзаман
йахьъакӏвызлакӏгьи<adv>:йахьъакӏвызлакӏгьи
сыха<adv>:сыха
ацӏжва<adv>:ацӏжва
къваласга<adv>:къваласга
ауацӏала<adv>:ауацӏала
ауацӏыхта<adv>:ауацӏыхта
гвжважварала<adv>:гвжважварала
гвжважвагӏвала<adv>:гвжважвагӏвала
цӏагъата<adv>:цӏагъата
йашӏамсуа<adv>:йашӏамсуа
гвхъахь<adv>:гвхъахь
дзгӏаршыга<adv>:дзгӏаршыга
кӏьальальата<adv>:кӏьальальата
къазтара<adv>:къазтара
цӏда<adv>:цӏда
жвагӏвыла<adv>:жвагӏвыла
гӏалжварта<adv>:гӏалжварта
сакь<adv>:сакь
хъахвитрала<adv>:хъахвитрала
гӏваца<adv>:гӏваца
дурыс<adv>:дурыс
къвал<adv>:къвал
радзага<adv>:радзага
чӏварта<adv>:чӏварта
агӏан<adv>:агӏан
бжаптшы<adv>:бжаптшы
дзбжьага<adv>:дзбжьага
рызкъы<adv>:рызкъы
азаргванта<adv>:азаргванта
агӏылахӏва<adv>:агӏылахӏва
квчӏварта<adv>:квчӏварта
тахшвахта<adv>:тахшвахта
бацасса<adv>:бацасса
таразта<adv>:таразта
чрыкъвхьщы<adv>:чрыкъвхьщы
знымзара-зны<adv>:знымзара-зны
хъазыта<adv>:хъазыта
пкъага<adv>:пкъага
хвгӏвыла<adv>:хвгӏвыла
гвхӏальальта<adv>:гвхӏальальта
тшынла<adv>:тшынла
хӏамам<adv>:хӏамам
ацчалагӏв<adv>:ацчалагӏв
хвитта<adv>:хвитта
кьазууымца<adv>:кьазууымца
щапӏкӏыга<adv>:щапӏкӏыга
гвыртара<adv>:гвыртара
гӏалыцӏ-налыцӏ<adv>:гӏалыцӏ-налыцӏ
аларыдз<adv>:аларыдз
сасхьа<adv>:сасхьа
надата<adv>:надата
пхныла<adv>:пхныла
тамам<adv>:тамам
аныла-арыла<adv>:аныла-арыла
къвышлыкъвду<adv>:къвышлыкъвду
бзила<adv>:бзила
тхӏвыса<adv>:тхӏвыса
хӏваспатара<adv>:хӏваспатара
гвначӏта<adv>:гвначӏта
айгьдзарадаъа<adv>:айгьдзарадаъа
къвырда<adv>:къвырда
йгвысшӏысуа<adv>:йгвысшӏысуа
жвахъа<adv>:жвахъа
датша<adv>:датша
зын-замыза<adv>:зын-замыза
кӏважвата<adv>:кӏважвата
лгӏвата<adv>:лгӏвата
сквшигӏадзапхьадза<adv>:сквшигӏадзапхьадза
унагӏвашӏыц<adv>:унагӏвашӏыц
бацапххага<adv>:бацапххага
гвапата<adv>:гвапата
гъьал<adv>:гъьал
суратыгьата<adv>:суратыгьата
перо<adv>:перо
цӏабыргы<adv>:цӏабыргы
нартыхвджьапкъ<adv>:нартыхвджьапкъ
дахӏвтай<adv>:дахӏвтай
тлахӏа<adv>:тлахӏа
сажна<adv>:сажна
къврыкъв<adv>:къврыкъв
ахӏа<adv>:ахӏа
гвыпшката<adv>:гвыпшката
сынчӏва<adv>:сынчӏва
амальсызта<adv>:амальсызта
хъахь-цӏахьыта<adv>:хъахь-цӏахьыта
йымдырдзакӏва<adv>:йымдырдзакӏва
щтӏа<adv>:щтӏа
гвыргӏвазала<adv>:гвыргӏвазала
хъаззаджвыкӏта<adv>:хъаззаджвыкӏта
хӏагӏа<adv>:хӏагӏа
тшыхчарта<adv>:тшыхчарта
хъвы<adv>:хъвы
тлаткӏьапс<adv>:тлаткӏьапс
ччара<adv>:ччара
апкъьара<adv>:апкъьара
быгӏвчӏвы<adv>:быгӏвчӏвы
йаныпӏ<adv>:йаныпӏ
хъабралапа<adv>:хъабралапа
псыта<adv>:псыта
льульа<adv>:льульа
бзидздзата<adv>:бзидздзата
йара<adv>:йара
кадраква<adv>:кадраква
хӏаракӏыта<adv>:хӏаракӏыта
чвала<adv>:чвала
апхъа<adv>:апхъа
амгӏадата<adv>:амгӏадата
нагӏата<adv>:нагӏата
заочната<adv>:заочната
наспынтшата<adv>:наспынтшата
сас<adv>:сас
чвкьащта<adv>:чвкьащта
щалхга<adv>:щалхга
хӏваша<adv>:хӏваша
пробка<adv>:пробка
дзбылга<adv>:дзбылга
щардацӏуата<adv>:щардацӏуата
зджьаралагьи<adv>:зджьаралагьи
агӏвжвара<adv>:агӏвжвара
жвацы<adv>:жвацы
блахъ<adv>:блахъ
пыджь<adv>:пыджь
лымхӏа<adv>:лымхӏа
агӏвазачва<adv>:агӏвазачва
хъарачӏвыла<adv>:хъарачӏвыла
лахъвы<adv>:лахъвы
кӏьыдата<adv>:кӏьыдата
агӏвга-цӏга<adv>:агӏвга-цӏга
мчхара<adv>:мчхара
гӏапныла<adv>:гӏапныла
кӏаразын<adv>:кӏаразын
къазкъыч<adv>:къазкъыч
мшахъа-мшацӏыхъва<adv>:мшахъа-мшацӏыхъва
хӏачӏащ<adv>:хӏачӏащ
алыргата<adv>:алыргата
амгӏасы<adv>:амгӏасы
закӏгьи<adv>:закӏгьи
щапӏыла<adv>:щапӏыла
чвышта<adv>:чвышта
хвыцдза<adv>:хвыцдза
акврыдзца<adv>:акврыдзца
къаматара<adv>:къаматара
мчыдата<adv>:мчыдата
хъатахӏвачӏвгӏвыта<adv>:хъатахӏвачӏвгӏвыта
гӏващагӏарадъа<adv>:гӏващагӏарадъа
хӏаракӏыла<adv>:хӏаракӏыла
йгӏанаркӏынгьи<adv>:йгӏанаркӏынгьи
хӏварыбзата<adv>:хӏварыбзата
лацӏачӏвы<adv>:лацӏачӏвы
ъатӏатлатӏата<adv>:ъатӏатлатӏата
вагвыта<adv>:вагвыта
чкӏвынчва<adv>:чкӏвынчва
тичӏвы<adv>:тичӏвы
збарта<adv>:збарта
зымгӏва<adv>:зымгӏва
цкьата<adv>:цкьата
квайчӏвачва<adv>:квайчӏвачва
мыгӏвхъгара<adv>:мыгӏвхъгара
щкӏлаларта<adv>:щкӏлаларта
набгъата<adv>:набгъата
йшаъазлакӏгьи<adv>:йшаъазлакӏгьи
алажвы<adv>:алажвы
цӏыркӏьыта<adv>:цӏыркӏьыта
гвашв<adv>:гвашв
чӏыхвдза<adv>:чӏыхвдза
мадзата<adv>:мадзата
майысата<adv>:майысата
лаба-шӏаба<adv>:лаба-шӏаба
тшымдырхуата<adv>:тшымдырхуата
хвыдаъа<adv>:хвыдаъа
гвырбйанта<adv>:гвырбйанта
закӏытагьи<adv>:закӏытагьи
пшачвгьа<adv>:пшачвгьа
йащтацауата<adv>:йащтацауата
лахъвгӏахъасракӏла<adv>:лахъвгӏахъасракӏла
джьагӏвагӏвта<adv>:джьагӏвагӏвта
кьазудаъа<adv>:кьазудаъа
щтӏахьла<adv>:щтӏахьла
бнапкъырта<adv>:бнапкъырта
анцӏралагьи<adv>:анцӏралагьи
лухъара<adv>:лухъара
йапхъахауата<adv>:йапхъахауата
зын-заманкӏ<adv>:зын-заманкӏ
арахь<adv>:арахь
щъагӏвта<adv>:щъагӏвта
хахвата<adv>:хахвата
йапымшвтуа<adv>:йапымшвтуа
цӏагӏвта<adv>:цӏагӏвта
гӏатрышвтга<adv>:гӏатрышвтга
йалах<adv>:йалах
йанакӏвызлакӏгьи<adv>:йанакӏвызлакӏгьи
гӏврала<adv>:гӏврала
брускъал<adv>:брускъал
гваран<adv>:гваран
анахь-арахь<adv>:анахь-арахь
быжьбжала<adv>:быжьбжала
йанбакӏву<adv>:йанбакӏву
ашӏарпарта<adv>:ашӏарпарта
дзыгӏвбжьага<adv>:дзыгӏвбжьага
хъабралацӏа<adv>:хъабралацӏа
гӏвна<adv>:гӏвна
льальата<adv>:льальата
тшгӏва<adv>:тшгӏва
хъата-мата<adv>:хъата-мата
агӏв<adv>:агӏв
майыса<adv>:майыса
йгӏанаркӏын<adv>:йгӏанаркӏын
чӏарачӏата<adv>:чӏарачӏата
гъынщчӏвы<adv>:гъынщчӏвы
цӏабыргыта<adv>:цӏабыргыта
чвасысыгӏв<adv>:чвасысыгӏв
ласакӏвкӏвыга<adv>:ласакӏвкӏвыга
агата<adv>:агата
щазкӏвкӏвара<adv>:щазкӏвкӏвара
щардамцӏуата<adv>:щардамцӏуата
бжафа<adv>:бжафа
льажьадаъа<adv>:льажьадаъа
къальам<adv>:къальам
жвчва<adv>:жвчва
табахьщы<adv>:табахьщы
гвадзрыпшарта<adv>:гвадзрыпшарта
гвадзхыга<adv>:гвадзхыга
лахьы<adv>:лахьы
кӏьыда-кӏьыдата<adv>:кӏьыда-кӏьыдата
хъацӏагӏвыта<adv>:хъацӏагӏвыта
тып<adv>:тып
гӏайырта<adv>:гӏайырта
йшкӏвакӏваханацӏыкӏьара<adv>:йшкӏвакӏваханацӏыкӏьара
алахӏара<adv>:алахӏара
тшкӏвабарта<adv>:тшкӏвабарта
пхадата<adv>:пхадата
ацапшыта<adv>:ацапшыта
ъагӏвабльагӏва<adv>:ъагӏвабльагӏва
ркъацага<adv>:ркъацага
зны-зан<adv>:зны-зан
щчӏвы<adv>:щчӏвы
хӏарамчас<adv>:хӏарамчас
гӏалхырта<adv>:гӏалхырта
щымтахъа<adv>:щымтахъа
агӏыла-псыла<adv>:агӏыла-псыла
хъгӏала<adv>:хъгӏала
швабыжта<adv>:швабыжта
нар<adv>:нар
ъахӏчыхӏ<adv>:ъахӏчыхӏ
квба<adv>:квба
амщтахь<adv>:амщтахь
мцырата<adv>:мцырата
хъахьщы<adv>:хъахьщы
гӏвартхь<adv>:гӏвартхь
рыцӏа<adv>:рыцӏа
гӏважьчва<adv>:гӏважьчва
квнашылра<adv>:квнашылра
чага<adv>:чага
лапса<adv>:лапса
зджьакӏ-макӏ<adv>:зджьакӏ-макӏ
апхъапхъадза<adv>:апхъапхъадза
хынла<adv>:хынла
щкӏла<adv>:щкӏла
кьымасга<adv>:кьымасга
къычвга<adv>:къычвга
тшхьа<adv>:тшхьа
кӏьышвта<adv>:кӏьышвта
лампхащата<adv>:лампхащата
къвышлыкъв<adv>:къвышлыкъв
уайа<adv>:уайа
къайматта<adv>:къайматта
ацыта<adv>:ацыта
гвыбжата<adv>:гвыбжата
дзхъала<adv>:дзхъала
зджьарагьи<adv>:зджьарагьи
тшныта<adv>:тшныта
йахъах-ацӏах<adv>:йахъах-ацӏах
мара-мзыта<adv>:мара-мзыта
бальарыгъта<adv>:бальарыгъта
гвынгӏвыуачва<adv>:гвынгӏвыуачва
гьажьыта<adv>:гьажьыта
сакъта<adv>:сакъта
гвабанта<adv>:гвабанта
гӏакӏапарта<adv>:гӏакӏапарта
мачӏ-мачӏ<adv>:мачӏ-мачӏ
акъыльдата<adv>:акъыльдата
чкӏвхӏа<adv>:чкӏвхӏа
цӏахь<adv>:цӏахь
ъагӏвата<adv>:ъагӏвата
айквацӏгъа<adv>:айквацӏгъа
баркӏа<adv>:баркӏа
збар<adv>:збар
фачыгӏвптшыга<adv>:фачыгӏвптшыга
цӏапӏата<adv>:цӏапӏата
уакъва<adv>:уакъва
ацӏарпххата<adv>:ацӏарпххата
быжьмачӏла<adv>:быжьмачӏла
айхӏа<adv>:айхӏа
тшщахӏага<adv>:тшщахӏага
пчӏвара<adv>:пчӏвара
тлатапс<adv>:тлатапс
ъанквынта<adv>:ъанквынта
ужвыгьи<adv>:ужвыгьи
хъагӏата<adv>:хъагӏата
цӏыцӏ<adv>:цӏыцӏ
пшдзата<adv>:пшдзата
хъамкӏыхла<adv>:хъамкӏыхла
нхага<adv>:нхага
чуан<adv>:чуан
бжьпсыкӏ<adv>:бжьпсыкӏ
къабат-къабат<adv>:къабат-къабат
псарчӏвыта<adv>:псарчӏвыта
гвагван<adv>:гвагван
ъагӏвабльагӏвата<adv>:ъагӏвабльагӏвата
мадзара<adv>:мадзара
напӏыла<adv>:напӏыла
зынла<adv>:зынла
бжвами<adv>:бжвами
йаквкӏыта<adv>:йаквкӏыта
зджьара-мызджьара<adv>:зджьара-мызджьара
хӏакьа-псакьара<adv>:хӏакьа-псакьара
гвашӏата<adv>:гвашӏата
макъы<adv>:макъы
пахь<adv>:пахь
цӏахь-хъахь<adv>:цӏахь-хъахь
ручкӏа<adv>:ручкӏа
мчыла<adv>:мчыла
хӏвыхӏвчва<adv>:хӏвыхӏвчва
хъапыхьала<adv>:хъапыхьала
мыштыквыпха<adv>:мыштыквыпха
чвкьащ<adv>:чвкьащ
алапсата<adv>:алапсата
гӏвымгӏанакӏта<adv>:гӏвымгӏанакӏта
гвымга<adv>:гвымга
гъагъата<adv>:гъагъата
айхӏара<adv>:айхӏара
тхӏаусыхагӏв<adv>:тхӏаусыхагӏв
закӏыта<adv>:закӏыта
хъазча<adv>:хъазча
хшрадзага<adv>:хшрадзага
урна<adv>:урна
зны<adv>:зны
тамамта<adv>:тамамта
гвадзгӏайырта<adv>:гвадзгӏайырта
квпшыра<adv>:квпшыра
фачӏвы<adv>:фачӏвы
ауасахӏвагьи<adv>:ауасахӏвагьи
цӏайта<adv>:цӏайта
гвыбзыгъата<adv>:гвыбзыгъата
дзцарта<adv>:дзцарта
пчӏварта<adv>:пчӏварта
йапынкӏылата<adv>:йапынкӏылата
пшасра<adv>:пшасра
къвыбгӏан<adv>:къвыбгӏан
чвгьата<adv>:чвгьата
уадыргӏвана<adv>:уадыргӏвана
йапыжвац<adv>:йапыжвац
йахъых-ацӏых<adv>:йахъых-ацӏых
ауралагьи<adv>:ауралагьи
гӏвнакӏыта<adv>:гӏвнакӏыта
кьырацагӏв<adv>:кьырацагӏв
тыбгӏата<adv>:тыбгӏата
чӏен<adv>:чӏен
хӏагӏата<adv>:хӏагӏата
зальмыгӏала<adv>:зальмыгӏала
пхахӏач<adv>:пхахӏач
квыпрауыз<adv>:квыпрауыз
уфас<adv>:уфас
хъата-хъата<adv>:хъата-хъата
дзащтанчӏв<adv>:дзащтанчӏв
гвыжвкӏта<adv>:гвыжвкӏта
къарандашрыцӏарага<adv>:къарандашрыцӏарага
гвыцкьарала<adv>:гвыцкьарала
цӏарата<adv>:цӏарата
сагӏыз<adv>:сагӏыз
гвытгъьыгъьаджь<adv>:гвытгъьыгъьаджь
тшхъвы<adv>:тшхъвы
йшцауала<adv>:йшцауала
уапӏа-уапӏата<adv>:уапӏа-уапӏата
рыгӏв<adv>:рыгӏв
чкӏыла<adv>:чкӏыла
алагара<adv>:алагара
гвазанакь<adv>:гвазанакь
тшгайхымта<adv>:тшгайхымта
чвадата<adv>:чвадата
къады<adv>:къады
ахшам<adv>:ахшам
къвлейта<adv>:къвлейта
щуагӏала<adv>:щуагӏала
гвадзрыпшага<adv>:гвадзрыпшага
дара<adv>:дара
йауа<adv>:йауа
цӏахӏа<adv>:цӏахӏа
ужвы<adv>:ужвы
гвабанхъкъьа<adv>:гвабанхъкъьа
гъасырта<adv>:гъасырта
ашӏасдаъа<adv>:ашӏасдаъа
хъватыхга<adv>:хъватыхга
хъвакӏапсага<adv>:хъвакӏапсага
чӏыхвтӏкъытӏкъ<adv>:чӏыхвтӏкъытӏкъ
йатаркӏвах<adv>:йатаркӏвах
гвыла<adv>:гвыла
ацзакӏыта<adv>:ацзакӏыта
квсыга<adv>:квсыга
щхъвашӏарпага<adv>:щхъвашӏарпага
къваш<adv>:къваш
хъахьыла<adv>:хъахьыла
дзырлашв<adv>:дзырлашв
хӏакъьа<adv>:хӏакъьа
аргваныта<adv>:аргваныта
бжахӏва<adv>:бжахӏва
цӏолата<adv>:цӏолата
зджьара<adv>:зджьара
джвджвага<adv>:джвджвага
йащтагӏайуа<adv>:йащтагӏайуа
жвара-жвасквша<adv>:жвара-жвасквша
кьрамдз<adv>:кьрамдз
сгӏата<adv>:сгӏата
магӏанадата<adv>:магӏанадата
псы<adv>:псы
такӏырта<adv>:такӏырта
дзхъа<adv>:дзхъа
аъара<adv>:аъара
сыш<adv>:сыш
хъыпарта<adv>:хъыпарта
гӏвбата<adv>:гӏвбата
дзбжьычӏва<adv>:дзбжьычӏва
мачӏта<adv>:мачӏта
цӏакӏыта<adv>:цӏакӏыта
талмачта<adv>:талмачта
чӏвырхъала<adv>:чӏвырхъала
кьымгӏархӏвыга<adv>:кьымгӏархӏвыга
хъвакӏапсарта<adv>:хъвакӏапсарта
кӏарышвта<adv>:кӏарышвта
чвартахъкъьа<adv>:чвартахъкъьа
чкӏвынайдза<adv>:чкӏвынайдза
багъьата<adv>:багъьата
чарыуата<adv>:чарыуата
блыбыл<adv>:блыбыл
гвауата<adv>:гвауата
тутынчварта<adv>:тутынчварта
мадза-мадза<adv>:мадза-мадза
хъвахъвата<adv>:хъвахъвата
докъай<adv>:докъай
агӏвхъцӏа<adv>:агӏвхъцӏа
йхъарамкӏва<adv>:йхъарамкӏва
хӏварыбзала<adv>:хӏварыбзала
нападъа<adv>:нападъа
дзтапарта<adv>:дзтапарта
чгата<adv>:чгата
швабыж<adv>:швабыж
ъамапсыма<adv>:ъамапсыма
хӏвымпӏыла<adv>:хӏвымпӏыла
швра<adv>:швра
хъадылра<adv>:хъадылра
цӏбадата<adv>:цӏбадата
жахӏвагӏвы<adv>:жахӏвагӏвы
тшагахва<adv>:тшагахва
уацӏыхъван<adv>:уацӏыхъван
дагвсагърай<adv>:дагвсагърай
быжьжварта<adv>:быжьжварта
хъагата<adv>:хъагата
хъагвырчӏвала<adv>:хъагвырчӏвала
гвыгӏвбата<adv>:гвыгӏвбата
йахьшва-пшвауа<adv>:йахьшва-пшвауа
пена<adv>:пена
гвхъкъьагата<adv>:гвхъкъьагата
йкъапщханацӏыкӏьара<adv>:йкъапщханацӏыкӏьара
хъапалра<adv>:хъапалра
йангӏалуата<adv>:йангӏалуата
уца<adv>:уца
гъьщтӏа<adv>:гъьщтӏа
хъапшаста<adv>:хъапшаста
фашата<adv>:фашата
чвартата<adv>:чвартата
шӏчӏвара<adv>:шӏчӏвара
псыргла<adv>:псыргла
мгвачвахъала<adv>:мгвачвахъала
гвыгӏвба-хъагӏвбата<adv>:гвыгӏвба-хъагӏвбата
цӏакъа<adv>:цӏакъа
уачӏващта<adv>:уачӏващта
гъныла<adv>:гъныла
ъагӏва<adv>:ъагӏва
ахъазгӏваца<adv>:ахъазгӏваца
ласыта<adv>:ласыта
станок<adv>:станок
лакӏылцӏ<adv>:лакӏылцӏ
хьарта<adv>:хьарта
